Utah statutes.
56-1-3.   Stock subscriptions -- Minimum requirements.
The Division of Corporations and Commercial Code shall not issue a certificate
of incorporation to any railroad corporation which proposes to construct a
railroad until it shall appear by the affidavit of at least three of the
incorporators that $1,000 for each mile in length of the railroad proposed to
be constructed shall have been subscribed, and that 10% of the stock
subscribed by each stockholder has been paid in.
